Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 3. Private Loans for Privately Owned Public Water Systems

§ 4770.
Eligibility.

For the purpose of this subchapter, “VEDA” means the Vermont Economic Development Authority which is authorized to make loans on behalf of the State under this chapter when the loan recipient is a privately-owned public water system. Such loans shall be issued and administered by VEDA pursuant to this subchapter.

The owner or owners of a privately-owned community water system or a privately-owned nonprofit, noncommunity public water system may apply to VEDA for a loan from the Vermont EPA Drinking Water State Revolving Fund established under subchapter 1 of this chapter, the proceeds of which may be used to acquire requisite permits, design, plan, construct, repair, or improve an existing privately-owned public community water system in order to comply with federal and State standards and protect the public health. In addition, the owner or owners of a privately-owned, nonprofit community water system may apply to VEDA for a loan from the Vermont Drinking Water Planning Loan Fund established in section 4753 of this chapter.

A municipality, as defined under section 126 of Title 1, is not eligible for a loan under this subchapter.

A nonprofit organization is eligible to apply for a loan under this subchapter if that organization qualifies as tax exempt.

VEDA and the Secretary may prescribe any form of application or procedure required of the applicant for a loan hereunder, and may impose an application and an administrative fee determined reasonable and necessary to cover administrative costs. Fee proceeds shall be deposited in the administrative fee account established in subsection 4755(a) of this chapter. The loan application shall request such information as VEDA deems necessary to implement this subchapter.

Notwithstanding the eligibility criteria of subsection (a) of this section, loan proceeds may not be used for:

laboratory fees for monitoring;

operations and maintenance expenses; or

projects primarily intended to serve future growth.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 62

, § 75, eff. June 26, 1997; amended

1997, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 50, eff. April 29, 1998;

2001, No. 61

, § 40, eff. June 16, 2001.

§ 4771.
Conditions of loan agreement.

VEDA may make loans to applicants on behalf of the State for one or more of the purposes set forth in subsection 4770(b) of this title. Each such loan shall be made subject to the following conditions:

The loan shall be evidenced by a note payable over a term not to exceed 30 years. Repayment shall commence not later than one year after completion of the project for which loan funds have been applied.

The loan shall be secured with assets as determined by VEDA. VEDA may also require that the applicant assign all or a portion of the water system revenues as security for the loan, or may require the establishment of a reserve fund.

The loan recipient shall establish a dedicated source of revenue for repayment of the loan which may include a pledge of revenue from user charges, tap fees, development charges, and pledges of accounts receivable and the proceeds therefrom.

The rate of interest charged for loans shall be set by the State Treasurer, taking into consideration prevailing borrowing rates available to similarly situated applicants from private lenders and administrative fees to be charged to applicants. VEDA, in cooperation with the Secretary, shall periodically recommend interest rates to be set by the State Treasurer which are the lowest practicable rates consistent with maintaining the long-term integrity of the Fund. The interest rate set by the State Treasurer may be less than the prevailing borrowing rates available to similarly situated applicants from private lenders, but not less than zero percent.

Notwithstanding subdivision (4) of this subsection, a privately owned nonprofit community type system may qualify for a 40-year loan term at an interest rate, plus administrative fee, to be established by the Secretary of Natural Resources that shall be not more than three percent or less than minus three percent, provided that the applicant system meets the income level and annual household user cost requirements of a disadvantaged municipality as defined in subdivision 4752(12)(A) of this title, and at least 80 percent of the residential units served by the water system is continuously occupied by local residents and at least 80 percent of the water produced is for residential use.
(5) (A) Notwithstanding subdivision (4) of this subsection, a privately owned nonprofit community type system may qualify for a 40-year loan term at an interest rate, plus administrative fee, to be established by the Secretary of Natural Resources that shall be not more than three percent or less than minus three percent, provided that the applicant system meets the income level and annual household user cost requirements of a disadvantaged municipality as defined in subdivision 4752(12)(A) of this title, and at least 80 percent of the residential units served by the water system is continuously occupied by local residents and at least 80 percent of the water produced is for residential use.

[Repealed.]

If the Secretary determines that a privately owned nonprofit community type system qualifies for a loan under this subdivision, the Secretary shall certify the loan term and interest rate to VEDA. In no instance shall the annual interest rate, plus an administrative fee, be less than is necessary to achieve an annual household user cost equal to one percent of the median household income of the applicant water system computed in the same manner as prescribed in subdivision 4763c(b)(2) of this title.

Loans made to applicants by VEDA on behalf of the State under this subchapter shall be made in accordance with the terms and conditions specified in a loan agreement to be executed by VEDA and the applicant. The loan agreement shall specify the terms and conditions of the loan and repayment by the applicant, as well as other terms and conditions determined necessary by VEDA and the Secretary.

Disbursement of loan proceeds shall be based on certification by the loan recipient demonstrating that costs for which reimbursement is requested have been incurred and paid by the recipient. The recipient shall provide supporting evidence of payment upon the request of VEDA. Partial disbursements of loan proceeds shall be made not more frequently than monthly. Interim financing charges or short-term interest costs may constitute an allowable cost of a project for which a loan is extended, provided VEDA approved in advance the terms, conditions, interest rate, and other related matters concerning such financing or interest cost. In the event short-term financing is unavailable to the applicant, VEDA may make interim loan disbursements not more frequently than monthly to the applicant and its general contractor as co-payees upon submission of a certified request for payment supported by actual invoices or other evidence satisfactory to VEDA of costs incurred.

VEDA reserves the right to require confirmation from an independent registered professional engineer that work has been performed according to project plans and specifications approved by the Secretary prior to making any disbursement of the loan proceeds.

VEDA may include such additional requirements in the loan agreement as it determines necessary for the proper administration of the Fund, and which are consistent with applicable State and federal law and with other programs administered by VEDA under 10 V.S.A. chapter 12.

VEDA may require as part of the loan agreement that the applicant cause an audit of the project costs to be prepared and approved by VEDA prior to making final payment of the loan amount.

In the event of default, any amounts owed upon the loan shall be considered a debt for the purposes of

32 V.S.A. § 5932(4)

. VEDA may recover such debt pursuant to the set off debt collection remedy established under

32 V.S.A. §§ 5933

and 5934.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 62

, § 75, eff. June 26, 1997;

2001, No. 61

, § 41, eff. June 16, 2001; amended

2003, No. 63

, § 60, eff. June 11, 2003;

2003, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 65, eff. June 8, 2004;

2005, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 2, 2006;

2017, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. May 28, 2018;

2019, No. 141

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 13, 2020.

§ 4772.
Qualifications for eligibility; certification.

No loan to an applicant shall be made under this subchapter until:

The applicant has certified to VEDA that:

all State and federal permits and licenses, including land use, subdivision, water supply and wastewater permits, and water supply construction and operating permits, necessary to undertake the project for which financing has been sought will be obtained prior to expending construction funds under the loan;

the applicant has established a rate charge or assessment schedule that will generate sufficient revenue to pay the principal and interest on the loan and to pay reasonably anticipated costs of operating and maintaining the financed project and the system of which it is a part. VEDA may require that the rate charge or assessment schedule be approved by VEDA prior to approving a loan. Nothing in this subchapter shall affect the obligation of an applicant who is subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utility Commission under

30 V.S.A. §§ 102

and 203(3) to obtain prior approval of a rate change from such Commission pursuant to

30 V.S.A. § 225

;

if the applicant is subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utility Commission under

30 V.S.A. §§ 102

and 203(3), it has obtained the following approvals and has provided VEDA with copies of those approvals:

the certificate of public good issued by the Public Utility Commission pursuant to

30 V.S.A. §§ 231

(public good) and 108 approving the loan; and

the decision and order of the Public Utility Commission approving rates that are to be charged by the applicant.

The Secretary has certified to VEDA that:

the applicant and the project qualify for financing or assistance under section 4773 of this title and that the project has priority for receipt of financial assistance; and

the applicant has or as a result of the proposed project will have the technical, managerial, and financial capability to ensure compliance with the requirements of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act as amended.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 62

, § 75, eff. June 26, 1997; amended

1997, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 4773.
Loan priorities.

The Secretary shall at least annually prepare a list of projects, ranked in priority order, that are eligible for financial assistance under this subchapter. In establishing such priorities, the Secretary shall at a minimum consider the following:

the quality and quantity of water supplied by the existing system;

any declared health hazard to be abated by the proposed project;

the population to be served;

the readiness of the project to proceed to the next planning or construction step; and

the consolidation of smaller water systems into new larger water systems.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 62

, § 75, eff. June 26, 1997.

§ 4774.
Contractual authority; reports.

The Secretary and VEDA may enter into agreements on behalf of the State with agencies of the United States as may be necessary to obtain grants and awards in furtherance of the stated purposes of the loan fund created under section 4753 of this title, provided that notification of each such agreement shall be made to the Chairs of the House and Senate Committees on Appropriations while the General Assembly is in session, and at other times to the Chair of the Joint Fiscal Committee, and that any such grant or award has been approved pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 5

.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 62

, § 75, eff. June 26, 1997; amended

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 95.

§ 4775.
Liability against default.

Under no circumstance shall the State or VEDA become responsible for owning or operating a privately-owned community water system when the loan recipient defaults on a loan obligation or abandons the water supply or water system.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 62

, § 75, eff. June 26, 1997.

§ 4776.
Action for receivership.

Upon default of a loan, VEDA shall have the right to petition the Superior Court in the county in which any part of the water system is located, or the Public Utility Commission for systems subject to the jurisdiction of the Commission, to appoint a receiver.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 62

, § 75, eff. June 26, 1997.

§ 4777.
Loan consolidation.

Loans, or the outstanding balance of loans, made for the purpose of preparing engineering plans for a project may be consolidated with any subsequent loans for construction.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 62

, § 75, eff. June 26, 1997.

§ 4778.
Federal capitalization grant distribution.

The Secretary may use any available and lawful funds to match federal funds otherwise available to capitalize the Fund created by subdivision 4753(a)(3) of this title. Up to 20 percent of the funds which have been identified in the annual State Intended Use Plan (IUP) and allocated for water supply projects may be used for loans to privately-owned public water systems. Any balance, excepting set-asides authorized by federal law, shall be directed to be used for loans to improve municipal water systems. Should there occur any surplus of funds for municipal water system projects in any given year, those funds may be used to fund additional privately owned public water systems.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 62

, § 75, eff. June 26, 1997; amended

1997, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1999, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.